Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.655.110

Annual school performance report—Model report form.

(1) Beginning with the 1994-95 school year, to provide the local community and electorate with access to information on the educational programs in the schools in the district, each school shall publish annually a school performance report and deliver the report to each parent with children enrolled in the school and make the report available to the community served by the school. The annual performance report shall be in a form that can be easily understood and be used by parents, guardians, and other members of the community who are not professional educators to make informed educational decisions. As data from the assessments in *RCW 28A.655.060 becomes available, the annual performance report should enable parents, educators, and school board members to determine whether students in the district's schools are attaining mastery of the student learning goals under RCW 28A.150.210, and other important facts about the schools' performance in assisting students to learn. The annual report shall make comparisons to a school's performance in preceding years, student performance relative to the goals and the percentage of students performing at each level of the assessment, a comparison of student performance at each level of the assessment to the previous year's performance, and information regarding school-level plans to achieve the goals.

(2) The annual performance report shall include, but not be limited to: (a) A brief statement of the mission of the school and the school district; (b) enrollment statistics including student demographics; (c) expenditures per pupil for the school year; (d) a summary of student scores on all mandated tests; (e) a concise annual budget report; (f) student attendance, graduation, and dropout rates; (g) information regarding the use and condition of the school building or buildings; (h) a brief description of the learning improvement plans for the school; (i) a summary of the feedback from parents and community members obtained under RCW 28A.655.115; and (j) an invitation to all parents and citizens to participate in school activities.

(3) The superintendent of public instruction shall develop by June 30, 1994, and update periodically, a model report form, which shall also be adapted for computers, that schools may use to meet the requirements of subsections (1) and (2) of this section. In order to make school performance reports broadly accessible to the public, the superintendent of public instruction, to the extent feasible, shall make information on each school's report available on or through the superintendent's internet website.

[ 2010 c 235 s 703; 1999 c 388 s 303; 1993 c 336 s 1006. Formerly RCW 28A.320.205.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: RCW 28A.655.060 was repealed by 2004 c 19 s 206.

Finding—2010 c 235: See note following RCW 28A.405.245.

Findings—Intent—Part headings not law—1993 c 336: See notes following RCW 28A.150.210.

Findings—1993 c 336: See note following RCW 28A.150.210.